Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.810

Penalty.

Any violation of any provision of this chapter, except as otherwise provided, shall be a misdemeanor and punishable accordingly.

[ 1984 c 258 s 312; 1983 c 232 s 11; 1983 c 3 s 7; 1961 c 124 s 12; 1935 c 172 s 16; RRS s 2516-16. Formerly RCW 9.41.160.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Intent—1984 c 258: See note following RCW 3.34.130.

Severability—1983 c 232: See note following RCW 9.41.010.